Utah statutes.
35A-8-1607.   Division to distribute money -- Annual report -- Administration costs.

(1)  The division shall distribute loan and grant money if the loan or grant is approved by the board.

(2)  The division shall make an annual report concerning the number and type of loans and grants made as well as a list of recipients of this assistance to:

(a)  the Native American Legislative Liaison Committee, created in Section 36-22-1; and

(b)  the governor.

(3)  The division, with board approval, may use fund money for the administration of the fund, but this amount may not exceed 2% of the annual receipts to the fund.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

